Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7501
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-7501 to 44-7535 shall be known and may be cited as the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 444, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 216, § 18.